trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 0 0/151 . 228
SFX 592 Y 5
SFX 592 0 h/151 . 234
SFX 592 0 hmA/151 . 234
SFX 592 0 hm/151 . 234
SFX 592 0 hA/151 . 234
SFX 592 0 hn/151 . 234
SFX 422 Y 7
SFX 422 0 nh/152 . 235
SFX 422 0 nhmA/152 . 235
SFX 422 0 nhm/152 . 235
SFX 422 0 nhA/152 . 235
SFX 422 0 nhn/152 . 235
SFX 422 0 nny/152 . 235
SFX 422 0 nnA/152 . 235
SFX 593 Y 5
SFX 593 0 k/151 . 236
SFX 593 0 k/151 . 236
SFX 593 0 kmA/151 . 236
SFX 593 0 km/151 . 236
SFX 593 0 kn/151 . 236
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 0 An/150 . 237
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 0 0/152 . 238
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 A/153 . 239
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 0/154 . 228
SFX 552 Y 7
SFX 552 0 nh/155 . 235
SFX 552 0 nhmA/155 . 235
SFX 552 0 nhm/155 . 235
SFX 552 0 nhA/155 . 235
SFX 552 0 nhn/155 . 235
SFX 552 0 nny/155 . 235
SFX 552 0 nnA/155 . 235
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 0 0/155 . 238
SFX 553 Y 5
SFX 553 0 nk/155 . 240
SFX 553 0 nk/155 . 240
SFX 553 0 nkmA/155 . 240
SFX 553 0 nkm/155 . 240
SFX 553 0 nkn/155 . 240
SFX 232 Y 13
SFX 232 0 A/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Ah/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 AhmA/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Ahm/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 AhA/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Ahn/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Ak/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Ak/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 AkmA/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Akm/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Akn/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 Ay/156 . 241
SFX 232 0 AnA/156 . 241
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 p/156 . 242
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 0 wA/157 . 243
SFX 379 Y 7
SFX 379 0 wnh/158 . 244
SFX 379 0 wnhmA/158 . 244
SFX 379 0 wnhm/158 . 244
SFX 379 0 wnhA/158 . 244
SFX 379 0 wnhn/158 . 244
SFX 379 0 wnny/158 . 244
SFX 379 0 wnnA/158 . 244
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 An/156 . 245
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 0/145 . 246
SFX 267 Y 13
SFX 267 0 y/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 yh/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 yhmA/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 yhm/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 yhA/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 yhn/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 yk/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 yk/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 ykmA/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 ykm/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 ykn/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 y/159 . 247
SFX 267 0 ynA/159 . 247
SFX 380 Y 5
SFX 380 0 wnk/158 . 248
SFX 380 0 wnk/158 . 248
SFX 380 0 wnkmA/158 . 248
SFX 380 0 wnkm/158 . 248
SFX 380 0 wnkn/158 . 248
SFX 358 Y 7
SFX 358 0 wh/149 . 249
SFX 358 0 whmA/149 . 249
SFX 358 0 whm/149 . 249
SFX 358 0 whA/149 . 249
SFX 358 0 whn/149 . 249
SFX 358 0 wny/149 . 249
SFX 358 0 wnA/149 . 249
SFX 359 Y 5
SFX 359 0 wk/149 . 250
SFX 359 0 wk/149 . 250
SFX 359 0 wkmA/149 . 250
SFX 359 0 wkm/149 . 250
SFX 359 0 wkn/149 . 250
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 At/156 . 251
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 0 wA/160 . 252
SFX 25 Y 12
SFX 25 0 |th/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |thmA/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |thm/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |thA/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |thn/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |tk/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |tk/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |tkmA/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |tkm/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |tkn/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |ty/161 . 253
SFX 25 0 |tnA/161 . 253
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 0 wA/162 . 252
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 wn/149 . 254
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 n/161 . 255
SFX 157 Y 7
SFX 157 0 yh/145 . 256
SFX 157 0 yhmA/145 . 256
SFX 157 0 yhm/145 . 256
SFX 157 0 yhA/145 . 256
SFX 157 0 yhn/145 . 256
SFX 157 0 yny/145 . 256
SFX 157 0 ynA/145 . 256
SFX 508 Y 7
SFX 508 0 h/153 . 257
SFX 508 0 hmA/153 . 257
SFX 508 0 hm/153 . 257
SFX 508 0 hA/153 . 257
SFX 508 0 hn/153 . 257
SFX 508 0 ny/153 . 257
SFX 508 0 nA/153 . 257
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 A/163 . 239
SFX 509 Y 5
SFX 509 0 k/153 . 224
SFX 509 0 k/153 . 224
SFX 509 0 kmA/153 . 224
SFX 509 0 km/153 . 224
SFX 509 0 kn/153 . 224
SFX 429 Y 1
SFX 429 0 wA/164 . 231
SFX 314 Y 12
SFX 314 0 h/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 hmA/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 hm/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 hA/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 hn/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 k/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 k/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 kmA/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 km/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 kn/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 ny/157 . 258
SFX 314 0 nA/157 . 258
SFX 598 Y 5
SFX 598 0 h/165 . 234
SFX 598 0 hmA/165 . 234
SFX 598 0 hm/165 . 234
SFX 598 0 hA/165 . 234
SFX 598 0 hn/165 . 234
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 n/153 . 226
SFX 312 Y 12
SFX 312 0 wh/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 whmA/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 whm/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 whA/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 whn/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 wk/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 wk/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 wkmA/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 wkm/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 wkn/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 wny/157 . 259
SFX 312 0 wnA/157 . 259
SFX 599 Y 5
SFX 599 0 k/165 . 236
SFX 599 0 k/165 . 236
SFX 599 0 kmA/165 . 236
SFX 599 0 km/165 . 236
SFX 599 0 kn/165 . 236
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 0 yn/161 . 260
SFX 463 Y 7
SFX 463 0 wh/160 . 261
SFX 463 0 whmA/160 . 261
SFX 463 0 whm/160 . 261
SFX 463 0 whA/160 . 261
SFX 463 0 whn/160 . 261
SFX 463 0 wny/160 . 261
SFX 463 0 wnA/160 . 261
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 0 wA/158 . 252
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 0/153 . 262
SFX 457 Y 7
SFX 457 0 wh/162 . 261
SFX 457 0 whmA/162 . 261
SFX 457 0 whm/162 . 261
SFX 457 0 whA/162 . 261
SFX 457 0 whn/162 . 261
SFX 457 0 wny/162 . 261
SFX 457 0 wnA/162 . 261
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 wA/149 . 252
SFX 464 Y 5
SFX 464 0 wk/160 . 263
SFX 464 0 wk/160 . 263
SFX 464 0 wkmA/160 . 263
SFX 464 0 wkm/160 . 263
SFX 464 0 wkn/160 . 263
SFX 458 Y 5
SFX 458 0 wk/162 . 263
SFX 458 0 wk/162 . 263
SFX 458 0 wkmA/162 . 263
SFX 458 0 wkm/162 . 263
SFX 458 0 wkn/162 . 263
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 0 wA/158 . 231
SFX 528 Y 7
SFX 528 0 h/166 . 257
SFX 528 0 hmA/166 . 257
SFX 528 0 hm/166 . 257
SFX 528 0 hA/166 . 257
SFX 528 0 hn/166 . 257
SFX 528 0 ny/166 . 257
SFX 528 0 nA/166 . 257
SFX 226 Y 13
SFX 226 0 y/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 yh/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 yhmA/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 yhm/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 yhA/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 yhn/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 yk/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 yk/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 ykmA/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 ykm/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 ykn/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 y/167 . 247
SFX 226 0 ynA/167 . 247
SFX 130 Y 13
SFX 130 0 w/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 wh/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 whmA/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 whm/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 whA/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 whn/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 wk/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 wk/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 wkmA/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 wkm/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 wkn/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 y/145 . 264
SFX 130 0 wnA/145 . 264
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 0 A/168 . 239
SFX 430 Y 7
SFX 430 0 wh/164 . 249
SFX 430 0 whmA/164 . 249
SFX 430 0 whm/164 . 249
SFX 430 0 whA/164 . 249
SFX 430 0 whn/164 . 249
SFX 430 0 wny/164 . 249
SFX 430 0 wnA/164 . 249
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 wn/145 . 227
SFX 426 Y 7
SFX 426 0 nh/169 . 235
SFX 426 0 nhmA/169 . 235
SFX 426 0 nhm/169 . 235
SFX 426 0 nhA/169 . 235
SFX 426 0 nhn/169 . 235
SFX 426 0 nny/169 . 235
SFX 426 0 nnA/169 . 235
SFX 431 Y 5
SFX 431 0 wk/164 . 250
SFX 431 0 wk/164 . 250
SFX 431 0 wkmA/164 . 250
SFX 431 0 wkm/164 . 250
SFX 431 0 wkn/164 . 250
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 0/169 . 238
SFX 352 Y 7
SFX 352 0 ynh/170 . 265
SFX 352 0 ynhmA/170 . 265
SFX 352 0 ynhm/170 . 265
SFX 352 0 ynhA/170 . 265
SFX 352 0 ynhn/170 . 265
SFX 352 0 ynny/170 . 265
SFX 352 0 ynnA/170 . 265
SFX 139 Y 24
SFX 139 0 th/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 thmA/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 thm/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 thA/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 thn/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tk/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tk/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tkmA/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tkm/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tkn/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tny/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tnA/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAh/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAhmA/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAhm/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAhA/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAhn/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAk/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAk/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAkmA/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAkm/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAkn/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAny/145 . 266
SFX 139 0 tAnA/145 . 266
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 n/171 . 267
SFX 432 Y 1
SFX 432 0 wn/164 . 254
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 tyn/146 . 268
SFX 348 Y 7
SFX 348 0 ynh/172 . 265
SFX 348 0 ynhmA/172 . 265
SFX 348 0 ynhm/172 . 265
SFX 348 0 ynhA/172 . 265
SFX 348 0 ynhn/172 . 265
SFX 348 0 ynny/172 . 265
SFX 348 0 ynnA/172 . 265
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 n/173 . 267
SFX 333 Y 5
SFX 333 0 h/174 . 234
SFX 333 0 hmA/174 . 234
SFX 333 0 hm/174 . 234
SFX 333 0 hA/174 . 234
SFX 333 0 hn/174 . 234
SFX 376 Y 7
SFX 376 0 wh/158 . 261
SFX 376 0 whmA/158 . 261
SFX 376 0 whm/158 . 261
SFX 376 0 whA/158 . 261
SFX 376 0 whn/158 . 261
SFX 376 0 wny/158 . 261
SFX 376 0 wnA/158 . 261
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 0/163 . 262
SFX 364 Y 7
SFX 364 0 wh/149 . 261
SFX 364 0 whmA/149 . 261
SFX 364 0 whm/149 . 261
SFX 364 0 whA/149 . 261
SFX 364 0 whn/149 . 261
SFX 364 0 wny/149 . 261
SFX 364 0 wnA/149 . 261
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 yn/146 . 269
SFX 377 Y 5
SFX 377 0 wk/158 . 263
SFX 377 0 wk/158 . 263
SFX 377 0 wkmA/158 . 263
SFX 377 0 wkm/158 . 263
SFX 377 0 wkn/158 . 263
SFX 370 Y 7
SFX 370 0 wh/158 . 249
SFX 370 0 whmA/158 . 249
SFX 370 0 whm/158 . 249
SFX 370 0 whA/158 . 249
SFX 370 0 whn/158 . 249
SFX 370 0 wny/158 . 249
SFX 370 0 wnA/158 . 249
SFX 365 Y 5
SFX 365 0 wk/149 . 263
SFX 365 0 wk/149 . 263
SFX 365 0 wkmA/149 . 263
SFX 365 0 wkm/149 . 263
SFX 365 0 wkn/149 . 263
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 wn/158 . 270
SFX 371 Y 5
SFX 371 0 wk/158 . 250
SFX 371 0 wk/158 . 250
SFX 371 0 wkmA/158 . 250
SFX 371 0 wkm/158 . 250
SFX 371 0 wkn/158 . 250
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 wn/149 . 270
SFX 445 Y 7
SFX 445 0 wnh/175 . 271
SFX 445 0 wnhmA/175 . 271
SFX 445 0 wnhm/175 . 271
SFX 445 0 wnhA/175 . 271
SFX 445 0 wnhn/175 . 271
SFX 445 0 wnny/175 . 271
SFX 445 0 wnnA/175 . 271
SFX 372 Y 1
SFX 372 0 wn/158 . 254
SFX 587 Y 2
SFX 587 0 ny/176 . 230
SFX 587 0 nA/176 . 230
SFX 433 Y 7
SFX 433 0 wnh/164 . 271
SFX 433 0 wnhmA/164 . 271
SFX 433 0 wnhm/164 . 271
SFX 433 0 wnhA/164 . 271
SFX 433 0 wnhn/164 . 271
SFX 433 0 wnny/164 . 271
SFX 433 0 wnnA/164 . 271
SFX 446 Y 5
SFX 446 0 wnk/175 . 272
SFX 446 0 wnk/175 . 272
SFX 446 0 wnkmA/175 . 272
SFX 446 0 wnkm/175 . 272
SFX 446 0 wnkn/175 . 272
SFX 119 Y 13
SFX 119 0 tA/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAh/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAhmA/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAhm/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAhA/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAhn/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAk/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAk/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAkmA/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAkm/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAkn/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAy/145 . 273
SFX 119 0 tAnA/145 . 273
SFX 321 Y 5
SFX 321 0 h/177 . 234
SFX 321 0 hmA/177 . 234
SFX 321 0 hm/177 . 234
SFX 321 0 hA/177 . 234
SFX 321 0 hn/177 . 234
SFX 434 Y 5
SFX 434 0 wnk/164 . 272
SFX 434 0 wnk/164 . 272
SFX 434 0 wnkmA/164 . 272
SFX 434 0 wnkm/164 . 272
SFX 434 0 wnkn/164 . 272
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 p/178 . 242
SFX 262 Y 12
SFX 262 0 th/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 thmA/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 thm/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 thA/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 thn/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 tk/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 tk/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 tkmA/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 tkm/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 tkn/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 ty/159 . 274
SFX 262 0 tnA/159 . 274
SFX 322 Y 5
SFX 322 0 k/177 . 236
SFX 322 0 k/177 . 236
SFX 322 0 kmA/177 . 236
SFX 322 0 km/177 . 236
SFX 322 0 kn/177 . 236
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 0/178 . 228
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 tAn/145 . 229
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 0/179 . 228
SFX 111 Y 12
SFX 111 0 |th/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |thmA/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |thm/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |thA/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |thn/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |tk/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |tk/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |tkmA/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |tkm/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |tkn/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |ty/145 . 253
SFX 111 0 |tnA/145 . 253
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 At/178 . 251
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 wA/161 . 275
SFX 451 Y 7
SFX 451 0 wnh/175 . 244
SFX 451 0 wnhmA/175 . 244
SFX 451 0 wnhm/175 . 244
SFX 451 0 wnhA/175 . 244
SFX 451 0 wnhn/175 . 244
SFX 451 0 wnny/175 . 244
SFX 451 0 wnnA/175 . 244
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 0 wA/175 . 231
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 0/165 . 228
SFX 452 Y 5
SFX 452 0 wnk/175 . 248
SFX 452 0 wnk/175 . 248
SFX 452 0 wnkmA/175 . 248
SFX 452 0 wnkm/175 . 248
SFX 452 0 wnkn/175 . 248
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 0 0/168 . 262
SFX 543 Y 7
SFX 543 0 h/171 . 276
SFX 543 0 hmA/171 . 276
SFX 543 0 hm/171 . 276
SFX 543 0 hA/171 . 276
SFX 543 0 hn/171 . 276
SFX 543 0 ny/171 . 276
SFX 543 0 nA/171 . 276
SFX 537 Y 7
SFX 537 0 h/180 . 276
SFX 537 0 hmA/180 . 276
SFX 537 0 hm/180 . 276
SFX 537 0 hA/180 . 276
SFX 537 0 hn/180 . 276
SFX 537 0 ny/180 . 276
SFX 537 0 nA/180 . 276
SFX 343 Y 2
SFX 343 0 ny/147 . 230
SFX 343 0 nA/147 . 230
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 y/181 . 277
SFX 544 Y 5
SFX 544 0 k/171 . 278
SFX 544 0 k/171 . 278
SFX 544 0 kmA/171 . 278
SFX 544 0 km/171 . 278
SFX 544 0 kn/171 . 278
